Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB288.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-A.2CONSTRUCTION TAX CREDIT REQUIREMENTSSection 1701-A.2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Construction tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the following:(1) Article XVII-D.(2) Article XVII-G.(3) Article XVIII-G.(4) Article XIX-C.(5) Article XIX-E.(6) Article XIX-F.(7) Article XXIX-D."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth. Section 1702-A.2. Eligibility for credit. (a) Eligibility.--In addition to any other requirements provided by a law of this Commonwealth, regulation or guideline, before a construction tax credit may be awarded to a taxpayer that has made a capital expenditure of more than $25,000 to construct, reconstruct, demolish, alter or repair a facility, the department, in consultation with the Department of Labor and Industry, shall verify that the taxpayer has:(1) made good faith efforts to recruit and employ, and to encourage any contractors or subcontractors of the taxpayer to recruit and employ, workers from the local labor market for employment during the construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair of the facility phase; and(2) demonstrated that individuals employed by the taxpayer or any contractor or subcontractor of the taxpayer for the construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair of the facility have been paid the prevailing minimum wage rate for each craft or classification as determined by the Department of Labor and Industry under the 20250HB0288PN0233 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.(b) New jobs.--A facility for which a construction tax credit is sought and awarded shall be deemed to meet each of the minimum requirements necessary to apply the wage and benefit rates and related certification of payroll records required by the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act. A taxpayer or any contractor or subcontractor of the taxpayer engaged to perform on the facility shall comply with all provisions and requirements of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act for all new jobs and for each craft or classification performing construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair work, other than maintenance work, undertaken at the facility during the initial construction and during any period when construction tax credit is sought and awarded for the facility.(c) Notification.--Before the solicitation of bids or proposals of any contract or subcontract for a facility for which a construction tax credit is sought, the taxpayer or the taxpayers shall notify the Department of Labor and Industry of the solicitation and request the issuance of a wage and benefit rate determination for each craft and classification anticipated to perform at the project facility. Rate requests shall be in conformity with the procedures of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, and the Department of Labor and Industry shall issue rates upon request as required under this subsection and the provisions of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.Section 1703-A.2. Enforcement.The Department of Labor and Industry shall enforce this article and shall apply the same administration and enforcement applicable to any construction, reconstruction, demolition, 20250HB0288PN0233 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 alteration or repair of a facility, other than maintenance work, undertaken in accordance with the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, to ensure compliance. Section 1704-A.2. Violations.(a) Refund requirement.--In addition to enforcement authorized under the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, and section 1703- A.2, if, after notice and hearing, the Department of Labor and Industry determines that a taxpayer intentionally failed to pay or intentionally caused another person to fail to pay the prevailing wage or benefit rates as specified under section 11(h) of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act for the construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair of a facility for which a construction tax credit is awarded, or ratified the intentional failure by any contractors or subcontractors of the taxpayer, the taxpayer shall refund 10% of the amount of the construction tax credit as follows:(1) in the case of initial construction, for the first fiscal year for which a tax credit is awarded; or(2) for the fiscal year in which the intentional noncompliance occurred as determined by the Department of Labor and Industry.(b) Appeals.--A finding of a violation under subsection (a) may be appealed under section 2.2(e)(1) of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act and 34 Pa. Code § 213.3 (relating to appeals from determinations of the Secretary). Any final determination by the Secretary of Labor and Industry or the Appeals Board under the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act may be appealed in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and 20250HB0288PN0233 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 procedure).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0288PN0233 - 5 - 12